Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 7. Sales Financing

§ 40-14-261.
Definitions; prohibited assignments; applicable provisions.

“Sales financing” means being primarily engaged in the business of taking by assignment or providing financing on behalf of sellers or lessors. Assignment under this subsection shall only include non-servicing rights against debtors arising from consumer credit sales or consumer leases which at the time of assignment the buyer or lessee is not in default.

“Sales finance company” means a person or organization engaged in the business of sales financing.

Unless a person is a supervised financial organization, is licensed under W.S. 40-14-302(b) or has first obtained a license from the administrator, no person shall engage in sales financing.

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 86, § 3.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 190, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-701; Laws 1982, ch. 29, § 2; 1996, ch. 86, § 3; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (a), substituted "on" for "in" preceding "behalf of", added "Assignment under this subsection shall only include non-servicing" preceding "rights against", deleted "and undertaking direct collection of payment from or enforcement of rights against debtors arising from these sales or leases" following "consumer leases"; in (c), added "is a supervised financial organization, is licensed under W.S. 40-14-302(b) or," substituted "no person shall engage in sales financing" for "authorizing him to take assignments of and undertake direct collection of payments from or enforcement of rights against debtors arising from sales and leases, not in default at time of assignment, he shall not engage in the business of taking such assignments"; and made stylistic changes.